Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1238
Lights required by federal rules; commission; option to adopt.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing that any vessel may carry and exhibit the lights required by the Inland Navigational Rules Act of 1980, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 2001 et seq., in lieu of the lights required by sections 37-1232 to 37-1237.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 38;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 39.